Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2211.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions shall have the following meanings except where the context clearly indicates that another meaning is intended:

“Commission” means the Vermont Real Estate Commission.

“Person” means and includes individuals, corporations, partnerships, trusts, associations, cooperatives, or other firms or entities, foreign or domestic.

“Real estate,” “real property,” “realty,” or words of like import means any interest or estate in land, excepting leaseholds, whether such interest or estate is corporeal, incorporeal, freehold, or nonfreehold, and whether situated in this State or elsewhere; provided, however, that the meaning as used in this chapter shall not include oil, gas, or mineral leases, nor shall it include any other mineral leasehold, mineral estate, or mineral interest of any nature whatsoever.

“Real estate broker” or “broker” means any person who, for another, for a fee, commission, salary, or other consideration, or with the intention or expectation of receiving or collecting such compensation from another, engages in or offers or attempts to engage in, either directly or indirectly, by a continuing course of conduct, any of the following acts:

lists, offers, attempts, or agrees to list real estate or any interest therein for sale or exchange;

sells, exchanges, or purchases real estate or any interest therein;

offers to sell, exchange, or purchase real estate or any interest therein;

negotiates, or offers, attempts, or agrees to negotiate the sale, exchange, or purchase of real estate, or any interest therein;

buys, sells, offers to buy or sell, or otherwise deals in options on real estate or any interest therein;

advertises or holds himself or herself out as being engaged in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging real estate or any interest therein;

assists or directs in the procuring of prospects, calculated to result in the sale or exchange of real estate or any interest therein; however, a nonlicensed employee of a licensee shall be allowed to respond to inquiries from members of the public, so long as the employee makes it clear that he or she is not licensed and that any information provided should be confirmed by a licensed person.

“Real estate salesperson” or “salesperson” means any person who for a fee, compensation, salary, or other consideration, or in the expectation or upon the promise thereof, is employed by or associated with a licensed real estate broker to do any act or deal in any transaction as provided in subdivision (4) of this subsection for or on behalf of a licensed real estate broker.

The terms “real estate broker,” “real estate salesperson,” or “broker” shall not include:

Any person, partnership, association, or corporation who as a bona fide owner performs any of the acts set forth in subdivision (a)(4) of this section with reference to property owned by them, nor shall it apply to regular employees thereof, when such acts are performed in the regular course of or as an incident to the management of such property and the investment therein. This subdivision (1) shall not apply to licensees.

Any attorney at law, admitted to practice in Vermont, handling sales of real estate in the course of estate or guardianship administration, or trust administration, bankruptcy proceedings, receiverships, or like actions subject to approval by a court of competent jurisdiction, or sales of real estate arising in the usual course of the practice of law.

Any person selling real estate as an auctioneer, provided such sale is advertised as a bona fide public auction.

Any bank or trust company or any of its officers or employees in the performance of their duties as an officer or employee of any such bank or trust company while performing activities listed in subdivision (a)(4) of this section with respect to real estate owned by that bank or trust company.

Any person holding in good faith a duly executed power of attorney from the owner, authorizing a final consummation and execution for the sale, purchase, or exchange of real estate when such acts are not of a recurrent nature and done with the intention of evading this section.

Any person while acting as a receiver, trustee, administrator, executor, guardian, or under court order, or while acting under authority of a deed, trust, or will.

Public officers while performing their duties as such.

Any person who leases real estate or any interest therein or any improvements affixed thereon, or offers to lease, negotiates the lease of, or advertises as being in the business of leasing real estate.

Any person registered as a securities dealer or salesperson by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation pursuant to 9 V.S.A. chapter 131 when selling securities.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 283

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1979, No. 81

, § 1, eff. May 10, 1979;

1985, No. 6

, § 1;

1989, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

1995, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 2212.
Prohibition.

Except as may be otherwise provided in this chapter, a person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation shall not engage in the business or act in the capacity of real estate broker or salesperson within this State without first obtaining a license therefor.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 6

, § 1.

§ 2213.
Penalties.

A person who shall violate any provision of this chapter shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 6

, § 1;

2007, No. 29

, § 33;

2019, No. 30

, § 16.

§ 2214.
Trust and escrow accounts.

Every real estate broker, within five banking days, shall deposit in a trust or escrow account in a bank or other financial institution licensed to do business in this State all earnest money and contract deposits held by him or her as a real estate broker in which the clients or other persons with whom the broker is dealing have an interest. Trust and escrow accounts shall be maintained separate and apart from a broker’s individual or office account. The broker shall maintain at the broker’s usual place of business, books, records, contracts, and other documents pertinent to or relating to the trust or escrow account and monies therein, which shall be open for inspection by the Commission and its duly authorized agents at the broker’s usual place of business during regular business hours. The broker shall notify the Commission, within 10 days after opening any trust or escrow account, of the bank or other financial institution in which the account is located.

If a deposit is reasonably expected to earn a substantial amount of interest, the broker shall, at the request of the person or persons making the deposit, place the deposit in an individual interest-bearing trust or escrow account for the benefit of the beneficial owner. In regard to individual interest-bearing trust and escrow accounts:

Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by all parties, the interest earned shall be applied to the purchase price due from the buyer if the sale is consummated, shall be returned to the buyer if the deposit is returned to the buyer, and shall be payable to the seller if the buyer defaults. Contracts shall carry this language conspicuously above the signature lines.

No checks shall be drawn against uncollected deposits in the account.

None of the contract deposits shall be withdrawn until the contract has been terminated by performance, or by operation of its own terms, or by agreement in writing between all parties involved in the contract, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

If a deposit is not reasonably expected to earn a substantial amount of interest, the broker shall place the deposit in a pooled interest-bearing trust or escrow account and direct that the interest be remitted to the Vermont Housing Finance Agency in accordance with the provisions of

8 V.S.A. § 14210

.

The broker shall inform the depositor whether funds are deposited into an individual account pursuant to subsection (b) of this section or in a pooled account pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. The broker shall retain a written statement of this disclosure signed by the beneficial owner of the account.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 283

(Adj. Sess.), § 12; amended

1985, No. 6

, § 1;

1991, No. 86

, § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1992;

1999, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. Jan. 1, 2001;

2013, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.